South Dakota, session 2026, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-13:
Any parent, guardian, or other person having control of a child who has a
notification of alternative instruction on file with the Department of Education or the school
district where the child is a resident, may not apply for or receive state public funds, as
defined by § 4-4-2, for the purpose of funding the child's education.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.